Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-238
Health regulations; sewer connections; power to compel.

A city of the primary class shall have the power by ordinance to regulate and prohibit cesspools and privy vaults in such city and shall have the power to require the owner or owners of any lot, lots, or lands within such cities, upon which any building or buildings are located, to connect such building or buildings with a sewer, to provide such building or buildings with a suitable privy or watercloset, and to connect such privy or watercloset with a sewer, and to require such owner or owners to keep all privy vaults and cesspools clean. Upon the refusal to connect with a sewer or failure of such owner or owners to provide a suitable watercloset or privy, or to make any sewer connection, or to remove any privy vault or cesspool, or to clean the privy vault or cesspool, after five days' notice by publication, or in place thereof, personal notice to so do, then such city, through its proper officers, shall have power to make any sewer connection, construct any watercloset or privy, regulate or remove any privy vault or cesspool, or clean the same, or cause the same to be done, and shall have the power to provide by ordinance for assessing the cost thereof by special assessment against the lot, lots, or lands of such owner or owners.

Laws 1915, c. 216, § 1, p. 485;

C.S.1922, § 3833;

C.S.1929, § 15-236;

R.S.1943, § 15-238;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 55.